Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1101
Act, how cited.

Sections 47-1101 to 47-1119 shall be known and may be cited as the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 1.